Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Article 10. Amendment of Articles of Incorporation and Bylaws.

§ 13.1-884.
Authority to amend articles of incorporation.

A corporation may amend its articles of incorporation at any time to add or change a provision that is required or permitted in the articles or to delete a provision not required in the articles. Whether a provision is required or permitted in the articles of incorporation is determined as of the effective date of the amendment.

A member of the corporation does not have a vested property right resulting from any provision in the articles of incorporation, including provisions relating to management, control, capital structure, purpose, or duration of the corporation.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-235; 1956, c. 428; 1985, c. 522.

Law Review.

For article reviewing changes in Virginia corporate and business law from June 2001 through May 2002, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1 (2002).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

4B M.J. Corporations, § 32.

§ 13.1-885.
Amendment of articles of incorporation by directors.

Where there are no members, or no members having voting rights, an amendment shall be adopted at a meeting of the board of directors upon receiving the vote of at least two-thirds of the directors in office. The board may adopt one or more amendments at any one meeting.

Unless the articles of incorporation provide otherwise, a corporation’s board of directors may adopt one or more amendments to the corporation’s articles of incorporation without member action:

To delete the names and addresses of the initial directors;

To delete the name of the initial registered agent or the address of the initial registered office, if a statement of change described in §

13.1-834

is on file with the Commission;

To add, delete, or change a geographic attribution for the name; or

To make any other change expressly permitted by this Act to be made without member action.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-236; 1956, c. 428; 1964, c. 580; 1985, c. 522; 2007, c. 925; 2015, c. 623.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 925 added the A designation at the beginning of the first paragraph; and added subsection B.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 623 in subdivision B 2, deleted “and address” following “name”; inserted “the address of the initial” and “described in §

13.1-834

.”

§ 13.1-886.
Amendment of articles of incorporation by directors and members.

Where there are members having voting rights, except where member approval of an amendment of the articles of incorporation is not required by this Act, an amendment to the articles of incorporation shall be adopted in the following manner:

The proposed amendment shall be adopted by the board of directors;

After adopting the proposed amendment, the board of directors shall submit the amendment to the members for their approval. The board of directors shall also transmit to the members a recommendation that the members approve the amendment, unless the board of directors makes a determination that because of conflicts of interest or other special circumstances it should not make such a recommendation, in which case the board of directors shall transmit to the members the basis for that determination; and

The members entitled to vote on the amendment shall approve the amendment as provided in subsection D.

The board of directors may condition its submission of the proposed amendment on any basis.

The corporation shall notify each member entitled to vote of the proposed members’ meeting in accordance with §

13.1-842

. The notice of meeting shall also state that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the proposed amendment and contain or be accompanied by a copy of the amendment.

Unless this Act or the board of directors, acting pursuant to subsection B, requires a greater vote, the amendment to be adopted shall be approved by each voting group entitled to vote on the amendment by more than two-thirds of all the votes cast by that voting group. The articles of incorporation may provide for a greater or lesser vote than that provided for in this subsection or a vote by separate voting groups so long as the vote provided for is not less than a majority of all the votes cast on the amendment by each voting group entitled to vote on the amendment at a meeting at which a quorum of the voting group exists.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-236; 1956, c. 428; 1964, c. 580; 1985, c. 522; 2007, c. 925.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 925 rewrote the section.

§ 13.1-887.
Voting on amendments by voting groups.

The articles of incorporation may provide that members of a class are entitled to vote as a separate voting group on specified amendments of the articles of incorporation.

History.

1985, c. 522.

Cross references.

As to adopting of plan of domestication, see §

13.1-898.3

.

§ 13.1-887.1.
Amendment prior to organization.

When a corporation has not yet completed its organization, its board of directors or incorporators, in the event that there is no board of directors, may adopt one or more amendments to the corporation’s articles of incorporation.

History.

2002, c. 607; 2007, c. 925.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 925 substituted “its board of directors or incorporators, in the event that there is no board of directors, may adopt” for “and, there are no members or directors” and deleted “may be adopted by a majority of the incorporators” at the end.

§ 13.1-888.
Articles of amendment.

A corporation amending its articles of incorporation shall file with the Commission articles of amendment setting forth:

The name of the corporation;

The text of each amendment adopted or the information required by subdivision L 5 of §

13.1-804

;

The date of each amendment’s adoption;

If an amendment was adopted by the incorporators or the board of directors without member approval, a statement that the amendment was duly approved by the vote of at least two-thirds of the directors in office or by a majority of the incorporators, as the case may be, including the reason member and, if applicable, director approval was not required;

If an amendment was approved by the members, either:

A statement that the amendment was adopted by unanimous consent of the members; or

A statement that the amendment was proposed by the board of directors and submitted to the members in accordance with this Act and a statement of:

The existence of a quorum of each voting group entitled to vote separately on the amendment; and

Either the total number of votes cast for and against the amendment by each voting group entitled to vote separately on the amendment or the total number of undisputed votes cast for the amendment by each voting group and a statement that the number cast for the amendment by each voting group was sufficient for approval by that voting group.

If the Commission finds that the articles of amendment comply with the requirements of law and that all required fees have been paid, it shall issue a certificate of amendment.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 13-226, 13-227, 13.1-237, 13.1-238; 1956, c. 428; 1966, c. 218; 1975, c. 500; 1985, c. 522; 2002, c. 607; 2007, c. 925; 2012, c. 130.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 607 redesignated a portion of former subdivision A 4 by adding the clause a designation; in clause A 4 a, deleted “or board of directors without member action” following “incorporators,” substituted “including the reason director approval and” for “and that,” and substituted “approval were not required, and a statement of the fact that the amendment was approved by a majority of the incorporators; and” for “action was not required”; and inserted clause A 4 b.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 925 added the language beginning “or the information required” at the end of subdivision A 2; and rewrote subdivision A 4.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 130, in subdivision A 4, substituted “vote of at least two-thirds of the directors in office or by a majority of the incorporators” for “incorporators or by the board of directors” and inserted “and, if applicable, director.”

§ 13.1-889.
Restated articles of incorporation.

A corporation’s board of directors may restate its articles of incorporation at any time with or without member approval.

The restatement may include one or more new amendments to the articles. If the restatement includes a new amendment requiring member approval, it shall be adopted and approved as provided in §

13.1-886

. If the restatement includes an amendment that does not require member approval, it shall be adopted as provided in §

13.1-885

.

If the board of directors submits a restatement for member approval, the corporation shall notify each member entitled to vote of the proposed members’ meeting in accordance with §

13.1-842

. The notice shall also state that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the proposed restatement and contain or be accompanied by a copy of the restatement that identifies any new amendment it would make in the articles.

A corporation restating its articles of incorporation shall file with the Commission articles of restatement setting forth:

The name of the corporation immediately prior to restatement;

Whether the restatement contains a new amendment to the articles;

The text of the restated articles of incorporation or amended and restated articles of incorporation, as the case may be;

Information required by subdivision L 5 of §

13.1-804

;

The date of the restatement’s adoption;

If the restatement does not contain a new amendment to the articles, that the board of directors adopted the restatement;

If the restatement contains a new amendment to the articles not requiring member approval, the information required by subdivision A 4 of §

13.1-888

; and

If the restatement contains a new amendment to the articles requiring member approval, the information required by subdivision A 5 of §

13.1-888

.

If the Commission finds that the articles of restatement comply with the requirements of law and that all required fees have been paid, it shall issue a certificate of restatement. When the certificate of restatement is effective the restated articles of incorporation or amended and restated articles of incorporation supersede the original articles of incorporation and all amendments to them.

The Commission may certify restated articles of incorporation or amended and restated articles of incorporation as the articles of incorporation currently in effect.

History.

1985, c. 522; 2002, c. 607; 2007, c. 925.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 607 inserted the last sentence of subsection B; and rewrote subsection D.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 925 substituted “approval” for “action” in subsections A and C; in subsection B, in the next-to-last sentence, substituted “a new” for “an” and inserted “and approved” following “adopted”; inserted “new” preceding “amendment” in the last sentence of subsection C; rewrote subsection D; inserted “or amended and restated articles of incorporation” in the last sentence of subsection E and in subsection F; and deleted the language beginning “without including” at the end in subsection F.

§ 13.1-890.
Repealed by Acts 2007, c. 925, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §

13.1-890

, pertaining to amendment of articles of incorporation pursuant to reorganization, derived from Acts 1985, c. 522.

§ 13.1-891.
Effect of amendment of articles of incorporation.

An amendment to the articles of incorporation does not affect a cause of action existing in favor of or against the corporation, a proceeding to which the corporation is a party, or the existing rights of persons other than members of the corporation. An amendment changing a corporation’s name does not abate a proceeding brought by or against the corporation in its former name.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-239; 1956, c. 428; 1985, c. 522; 2007, c. 925.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 925 substituted “to” for “of” following “amendment” in the first sentence.

§ 13.1-892.
Amendment of bylaws by board of directors or members.

A corporation’s board of directors may amend or repeal the corporation’s bylaws except to the extent that:

The articles of incorporation or §

13.1-893

reserves that power exclusively to the members; or

The members in repealing, adopting, or amending a bylaw expressly provide that the board of directors may not amend, repeal, or reinstate that bylaw.

History.

1985, c. 522; 2007, c. 925.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 925 substituted “§

13.1-893

reserves that” for “this chapter reserves this” in subdivision 1; and in subdivision 2, substituted “repealing, adopting, or amending a bylaw expressly provide” for “adopting, or amending particular bylaws provide expressly,” inserted “or reinstate” following “repeal” and made a related change.

Law Review.

For comment, “Private Ordering in the Old Dominion: A Solution to Frivolous Litigation or the Elimination of a Fundamental Shareholder Right?” see 53 U. Rich. L. Rev. 297 (2018).

§ 13.1-893.
Bylaw provisions increasing quorum or voting requirements for directors.

A bylaw that increases a quorum or voting requirement for the board of directors may be amended or repealed:

If originally adopted by the members, only by the members, unless the bylaws otherwise provide; or

If adopted by the board of directors, either by the members or by the board of directors.

A bylaw adopted or amended by the members that increases a quorum or voting requirement for the board of directors may provide that it shall be amended or repealed only by a specified vote of either the members or the board of directors.

Action by the board of directors under subsection A to amend or repeal a bylaw that changes the quorum or voting requirement applicable to meetings of the board of directors shall be effective only if it meets the quorum requirement and is adopted by the vote required to take action under the quorum and voting requirement then in effect.

History.

1985, c. 522; 2007, c. 925.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 925 substituted “increases a quorum” for “fixes a greater quorum” in subsections A and B; added “or unless the bylaws otherwise provide; or” at the end of subdivision A 1; deleted “originally” preceding “adopted” in subdivision A 2; substituted “shall” for “may” in subsection B; and in subsection C, substituted “subsection A to amend or repeal” for “subdivision 2 of subsection A of this section to adopt or amend,” “shall be effective only if it meets” for “shall meet” and “is adopted” for “be adopted.”